Hawaii statutes.
§171-54 Land license. The board of
land and natural resources may issue land licenses affecting public lands for a
period not exceeding twenty years. No land license shall be disposed of except
at public auction as provided in this chapter; provided that the board may,
after publication of notice in accordance with section 171-16(d), dispose of a
land license by negotiation, without recourse to public auction, if it
determines that the public interest will best be served thereby. The
disposition of a land license by negotiation shall be upon such terms and
conditions as the board determines shall best serve the public interest. [L
1962, c 32, pt of §2; am L 1965, c 239, §29; Supp, §103A-51; am L 1967, c 234,
§9; HRS §171-54]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next